California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(c) An entity conducting a pharmacy audit, a carrier, a health benefit plan sponsor, or other third-party payer, or any person acting on behalf of those entities, shall not attempt to make chargebacks or seek recoupment from a pharmacy, or assess or collect penalties from a pharmacy, until the time period for filing an appeal to a final audit report has passed, or until the appeal process has been exhausted, whichever is later. Should the identified discrepancy for a single audit exceed thirty thousand dollars ($30,000), future payments to the pharmacy in excess of thirty thousand dollars ($30,000) may be withheld pending adjudication of an appeal.

(d) Interest shall not accrue during the audit period for either party, beginning with the notice of the audit and ending with the conclusion of the appeal process.

(e) If, following final disposition of a pharmacy audit
 pursuant to this section, an entity conducting a pharmacy audit, a carrier, a health benefit plan sponsor, or other third-party payer, or any person acting on behalf of those entities, finds that an audit report or any portion thereof is unsubstantiated, the entity shall dismiss the audit report or the unsubstantiated portion thereof without the necessity of any further proceedings.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 706, Sec. 1.   (SB 1195)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

4439.

This chapter shall not be construed to suggest or imply that the Department of Consumer Affairs or the California State Board of Pharmacy has any jurisdiction or authority over the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 706, Sec. 1.   (SB 1195)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

4440.

(a) A pharmacy benefit manager that reimburses a contracting pharmacy for a drug on a maximum allowable cost basis shall comply with this section.

(b) A pharmacy benefit manager shall include in a contract, initially entered into, or renewed on its scheduled renewal date, on or after January 1, 2016, with the contracting pharmacy information identifying any national drug pricing compendia or other data sources used to determine the maximum allowable cost for the drugs on a maximum allowable cost list.

(c) A pharmacy benefit manager shall make available to a contracting pharmacy, upon request, the most
 up-to-date maximum allowable cost list or lists used by the pharmacy benefit manager for patients served by that pharmacy in a readily accessible, secure, and usable Web-based format or other comparable format.

(d) A drug shall not be included on a maximum allowable cost list or reimbursed on a maximum allowable cost basis unless all of the following apply:

(1) The drug is listed as “A” or “B” rated in the most recent version of the federal Food and Drug Administration’s approved drug products with therapeutic equivalent evaluations, also known as the Orange Book, or has an “NA,” “NR,” or “Z” rating or a similar rating by a nationally recognized pricing reference, such as Medi-Span or First
 DataBank.

(2) The drug is generally available for purchase in the state from a national or regional wholesaler.

(3) The drug is not obsolete.

(e) For contracts initially entered into, or renewed on the scheduled renewal date, on or after January 1, 2016, a pharmacy benefit manager shall review and shall make necessary adjustments to the maximum allowable cost of each drug on a maximum allowable cost list using the most recent data sources available at least once every seven days.

(f) For contracts initially entered into, or renewed on the scheduled renewal date, on or after January 1, 2016, a pharmacy benefit manager shall have a clearly defined process for a
 contracting pharmacy to appeal the maximum allowable cost for a drug on a maximum allowable cost list that includes all of the following:

(1) A contracting pharmacy may base its appeal on either of the following:

(A) The maximum allowable cost for a drug is below the cost at which the drug is available for purchase by similarly situated pharmacies in the state from a national or regional wholesaler.

(B) The drug does not meet the requirements of subdivision (d).

(2) A contracting pharmacy shall be provided no less than 14 business days following receipt of payment for the claim upon which the appeal is based to file an appeal with a pharmacy benefit manager.
 The pharmacy benefit manager shall make a final determination regarding a contracting pharmacy’s appeal within seven business days of the pharmacy benefit manager’s receipt of the appeal.

(3) If an appeal is denied by a pharmacy benefit manager, the pharmacy benefit manager shall provide to the contracting pharmacy the reason for the denial and the national drug code (NDC) of an equivalent drug that may be purchased by a similarly situated pharmacy at the price that is equal to or less than the maximum allowable cost of the appealed drug.

(4) If an appeal is upheld by a pharmacy benefit manager, the pharmacy benefit manager shall adjust the maximum allowable cost of the appealed drug for the appealing contracting pharmacy and all similarly situated contracting pharmacies in the
 state within one calendar day of the date of determination. The pharmacy benefit manager shall permit the appealing pharmacy to reverse and resubmit the claim upon which the appeal was based in order to receive the corrected reimbursement.

(g) A contracting pharmacy shall not disclose to any third party the maximum allowable cost list and any related information it receives either directly from a pharmacy benefit manager or through a pharmacy services administrative organization or similar entity with which the contracting pharmacy has a contract to provide administrative services for that pharmacy.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 74, Sec. 3.   (AB 627)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

4441.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Labeler” means a person or entity that receives prescription drugs from a manufacturer or wholesaler and repackages those drugs for later retail sale and who has a labeler code from the federal Food and Drug Administration under Part 207 of Title 21 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(2) “Proprietary information” means information on pricing, costs, revenue, taxes, market share, negotiating strategies, customers, and personnel that is held by a pharmacy benefit manager and used for its business purposes.

(3) “Purchaser” means a health benefit plan sponsor or other third-party payer with whom a pharmacy benefit manager contracts to provide the administration and management of prescription drug benefits, except for a health care service plan licensed pursuant to Chapter 2.2 (commencing with Section 1340) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) This section shall apply to pharmacy benefit manager contracts that are entered into, amended, or renewed on or after January 1, 2019.

(c) (1) A pharmacy benefit manager shall exercise good faith and fair dealing.

(2) A pharmacy benefit manager has a fiduciary duty to a self-insured employer plan that includes a duty to be fair and truthful
 toward the client, to act in the client’s best interests, to avoid conflicts of interest, and to perform its duties with care, skill, prudence, and diligence.

(d) A pharmacy benefit manager shall notify a purchaser in writing of any activity, policy, or practice of the pharmacy benefit manager that directly or indirectly presents a conflict of interest that interferes with the discharge of the pharmacy benefit manager’s duty to the purchaser to exercise good faith and fair dealing pursuant to subdivision (c).

(e) The pharmacy benefit manager shall, on a quarterly basis, disclose, upon the request of the purchaser, the following information with respect to prescription product benefits specific to the purchaser:

(1) The aggregate wholesale acquisition costs from a
 pharmaceutical manufacturer or labeler for each therapeutic category of drugs containing three or more drugs, as outlined in the state’s essential health benefits benchmark plan pursuant to Section 1367.005 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) The aggregate amount of rebates received by the pharmacy benefit manager by therapeutic category of drugs containing three or more drugs, as outlined in the state’s essential health benefits benchmark plan pursuant to Section 1367.005 of the Health and Safety Code. The aggregate amount of rebates shall include any utilization discounts the pharmacy benefit manager receives from a pharmaceutical manufacturer or labeler.

(3) Any administrative fees received from the pharmaceutical manufacturer or labeler.

(4) Whether the pharmacy benefit manager has a contract, agreement, or other arrangement with a pharmaceutical manufacturer to exclusively dispense or provide a drug to a purchaser’s employees, insureds, or enrollees, and the application of all consideration or economic benefits collected or received pursuant to that arrangement.

(5) Prescription drug utilization information for the purchaser’s enrollees or insureds that is not specific to any individual enrollee or insured.

(6) The aggregate of payments, or the equivalent economic benefit, made by the pharmacy benefit manager to pharmacies owned or controlled by the pharmacy benefit manager.

(7) The
 aggregate of payments made by the pharmacy benefit manager to pharmacies not owned or collected by the pharmacy benefit manager.

(8) The aggregate amount of the fees imposed on, or collected from, network pharmacies or other assessments against network pharmacies, and the application of those amounts collected pursuant to the contract with the purchaser.

(f) The information disclosed pursuant to subdivision (e) shall apply to all retail, mail order, specialty, and compounded prescription products.

(g) Except for utilization information specified in paragraph (5) of subdivision (e), a pharmacy benefit manager is not required to make the disclosures required by subdivision (e) unless and until the purchaser agrees,
 in writing, to maintain as confidential any proprietary information.

(h) A pharmacy benefit manager shall not impose a penalty or offer an inducement to a purchaser for the purpose of deterring the purchaser from requesting the information set forth in subdivision (e).

(i) A pharmacy benefit manager shall disclose to a pharmacy network provider or its contracting agent any material change to a contract provision that affects the terms of reimbursement, the process for verifying benefits and eligibility, dispute resolution, procedures for verifying drugs included on the formulary, and contract termination at least 30 days before the date of the change to the provision.

(j) A pharmacy benefit manager shall not notify
 an individual receiving benefits through the pharmacy benefit manager that a pharmacy has been terminated from the pharmacy benefit manager’s network until the notification of termination has been provided to that pharmacy pursuant to subdivision (i).

(k) A pharmacy benefit manager shall not include in a contract with a pharmacy network provider or its contracting agent a
 provision that prohibits the provider from informing a patient of a less costly alternative to a prescribed medication.

(l) This section shall not apply to the following:

(1) A health care service plan or health insurer, if the health care service plan or health insurer offers, provides, or administers pharmacy benefit management services and if those services are offered, provided, or administered only to enrollees, subscribers, policyholders, or insureds who are also covered by health benefits offered, provided, or administered by that health care service plan or health insurer.

(2) An affiliate, subsidiary, related entity, or contracted medical group of a health care service plan or health insurer that would otherwise
 qualify as a pharmacy benefit manager, but offers, provides, or administers services only to enrollees, subscribers, policyholders, or insureds who are also covered by health benefits offered, provided, or administered by the health care service plan or health insurer.

(3) A contract authorized by Section 4600.2 of the Labor Code.

(m) The provisions of this section are severable. If any provision of this section or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 605, Sec. 1.   (SB 41)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 10. Psychiatric Technicians [4500. - 4548.]



  ARTICLE 1. Generally [4500. - 4509.5.]

4500.

This chapter is known and may be cited as the “Psychiatric Technicians Law.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1851.)
-------------------------------------------

4501.

(a) As used in this chapter, “board” means the Board of Vocational Nursing and Psychiatric Technicians of the State of California.

(b) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2029, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 590, Sec. 8.   (AB 3255)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

4501.1.

Protection of the public shall be the highest priority for the board in exercising its licensing, regulatory, and disciplinary functions. Whenever the protection of the public is inconsistent with other interests sought to be promoted, the protection of the public shall be paramount.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 107, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

4501.2.

Notwithstanding any other law, the repeal of Section 4501 renders the successor entity to the board in Section 4501 subject to review by the appropriate policy committees of the Legislature.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 586, Sec. 12.   (AB 1229)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

4502.

As used in this chapter, “psychiatric technician” means any person who, for compensation or personal profit, implements procedures and techniques that involve understanding of cause and effect and that are used in the care, treatment, and rehabilitation of mentally ill or emotionally disturbed persons, or persons with intellectual disabilities, and who has one or more of the following:

(a) Direct responsibility for administering or implementing specific therapeutic procedures, techniques, treatments, or medications with the aim of enabling recipients or patients to make optimal use of their therapeutic regime, their social and personal resources, and their residential care.

(b) Direct responsibility for the application of
 interpersonal and technical skills in the observation and recognition of symptoms and reactions of recipients or patients, for the accurate recording of these symptoms and reactions, and for the carrying out of treatments and medications as prescribed by a licensed physician and surgeon or a psychiatrist.

The psychiatric technician in the performance of these procedures and techniques is responsible to the director of the service in which those duties are performed. The director may be a licensed physician and surgeon, psychiatrist, psychologist, rehabilitation therapist, social worker, registered nurse, or other professional personnel.

Nothing herein shall authorize a licensed psychiatric technician to practice medicine or surgery or to undertake the prevention, treatment, or cure of disease, pain, injury, deformity, or mental or physical condition in violation of the law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 632, Sec. 34.   (AB 1536)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4502.1.

A psychiatric technician, working in a mental health facility or developmental disability facility, when prescribed by a licensed physician and surgeon, may administer medications by hypodermic injection.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 632, Sec. 35.   (AB 1536)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4502.2.

A psychiatric technician, when prescribed by a licensed physician and surgeon, may withdraw blood from a patient with a mental illness or developmental disability if the psychiatric technician has received certification from the board that the psychiatric technician has completed a prescribed course of instruction approved by the board or has demonstrated competence to the satisfaction of the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 632, Sec. 36.   (AB 1536)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4502.3.

(a) A psychiatric technician, when prescribed by a licensed physician and surgeon, may perform the following activities on a patient with a mental illness or developmental disability:

(1) Tuberculin, coccidioidin, and histoplasmin skin tests, providing the administration is within the course of a tuberculosis control program.

(2) Immunization techniques, providing the administration is upon the standing orders of a supervising licensed physician and surgeon or pursuant to written guidelines adopted by a hospital or medical group with whom the supervising licensed physician and surgeon is associated.

(b) In performing activities pursuant to subdivision (a), the psychiatric technician shall satisfactorily demonstrate competence in all of the following:

(1) Administering the testing or immunization agents, including knowledge of all indications and contraindications for the administration of the agents.

(2) Recognizing any emergency reactions to the agent that constitute a danger to the health or life of the patient.

(3) Treating those emergency reactions by using procedures, medication, and equipment within the scope of practice of the psychiatric technician.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 632, Sec. 37.   (AB 1536)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4503.

(a) The board shall administer and enforce the provisions of this chapter.

(b) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2029, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 590, Sec. 9.   (AB 3255)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

4503.1.

Notwithstanding any other law, the repeal of Section 4503 renders the successor entity to the board in Section 4503 subject to review by the appropriate policy committees of the Legislature.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 586, Sec. 14.   (AB 1229)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

4504.

(a) The board shall prosecute all persons guilty of violating the provisions of this chapter.

(b) The board may employ clerical assistance as it deems necessary to carry into effect the provisions of this chapter. The board may fix the compensation to be paid for those services and may incur other expenses as it may deem necessary.

 (c) The board may adopt, amend, or repeal rules and regulations as may be reasonably necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter. Those rules and regulations shall be adopted in accordance with the provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2
 of the Government Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 632, Sec. 39.   (AB 1536)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4505.

Except as provided by Section 159.5, the board may employ whatever personnel is necessary for the administration of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 376, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

4507.

This chapter shall not apply to the following:

(a) Physicians and surgeons licensed pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 2000) of Division 2.

(b) Psychologists licensed pursuant to Chapter 6.6 (commencing with Section 2900) of Division 2.

(c) Registered nurses licensed pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 2700) of Division 2.

(d) Vocational nurses licensed pursuant to Chapter 6.5 (commencing with Section 2840) of Division 2.

(e) Social workers or clinical social workers licensed pursuant to Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 4991) of Division 2.

(f) Marriage and family therapists licensed pursuant to Chapter 13 (commencing with Section 4980) of Division 2.

(g) Professional clinical counselors licensed pursuant to Chapter 16 (commencing with Section 4999.10) of Division 2.

(h) Teachers credentialed pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 44200) of Chapter 2 of Part 25 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Education Code.

(i) Occupational therapists as specified in Chapter 5.6 (commencing with Section 2570) of Division 2.

(j) Art
 therapists, dance therapists, music therapists, and recreation therapists, as defined in Division 5 (commencing with Section 70001) of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations, who are personnel of health facilities licensed pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 1250) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code.

(k) Any other categories of persons the board determines are entitled to exemption from this chapter because they have complied with other licensing provisions of this code or because they are deemed by statute or by regulations contained in the California Code of Regulations to be adequately trained in their respective occupations. The exemptions shall apply only to a given specialized area of training within the specific discipline for which the exemption is granted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 389, Sec. 3.   (AB 2296)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

4508.

This chapter does not prohibit provisions of the services regulated herein with or without compensation or personal profit, when done by the tenets of any well-recognized church or denomination, so long as they do not otherwise engage in the practice set forth in the chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1323.)
-------------------------------------------

4509.5.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prevent persons from performing services described in Section 4502 for purposes of training to qualify for licensure under a program approved by the board or for training in another allied professional field.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1073.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Licensure [4510. - 4519.]

4510.

(a) The board shall issue a psychiatric technician’s license to each applicant who qualifies and, if required to take it, successfully passes the examination given pursuant to this chapter. The board shall also issue a psychiatric technician’s license to each holder of a psychiatric technician license who qualifies for renewal pursuant to this chapter and who applies for renewal.

(b) After the applicant passes the examination and upon receipt by the board of the initial license fee required by subdivision (h) of Section 4548, the board may issue a receipt or temporary certificate that shall serve as a valid permit for the licensee to practice under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 632, Sec. 40.   (AB 1536)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4510.1.

An applicant for license by examination shall submit a written application in the form prescribed by the board. Provided that the application for licensure is received by the board no later than four months after completion of a board approved psychiatric technician program and approval of the application, the board may issue an interim permit authorizing the applicant to practice all skills included in the permittee’s basic course of study, pending the results of the first licensing examination, or for a period of nine months, whichever occurs first.

A permittee shall function under the supervision of a licensed psychiatric technician or a registered nurse, who shall be present and available on the premises during the time the permittee is rendering professional
 services. The permittee may perform any function taught in the permittee’s basic psychiatric technician program.

If the applicant passes the examination, the interim permit shall remain in effect until an initial license is issued by the board or for a maximum period of six months after passing the examination, whichever occurs first. If the applicant fails the examination, the interim permit shall terminate upon notice by certified mail, return receipt requested, or if the applicant fails to receive the notice, upon the date specified in the interim permit, whichever occurs first. An interim permittee shall not use any title or designation other than psychiatric technician interim permittee or “P.T.I.P.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 338, Sec. 17.   (SB 539)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4510.2.

(a) Applicants and licensees shall provide the board a physical mailing address.

(b) Applicants and licensees shall provide the board an electronic mail address no later than July 1, 2022. Unless an applicant specifies in writing a preference for regular mail, the board shall direct all license-related correspondence to applicants and licensees using the electronic mail address on file, including, but not limited to, renewal notices and deficiency notices.

(c) The board may annually send an electronic notice to applicants and licensees to confirm their electronic mail address is current.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 632, Sec. 41.   (AB 1536)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4511.

An applicant for a psychiatric technician’s license shall have the following qualifications:

(a) Be at least 18 years of age.

(b) Have successfully completed an approved general education course of study through the 12th grade or the equivalent thereof as determined by the board.

(c) Have successfully completed (1) a prescribed course of study and training in a school approved by the board, which course of study and training shall combine the nursing knowledge and skills necessary for the care of any ill person and in addition those special skills necessary for the care of the
 mentally disabled and the developmentally disabled, or (2) a course of study and training which, together with previously acquired training or experience, is determined by a school approved by the board to be equivalent in academic credits to its regular program for psychiatric technician training, or (3) have completed a course of study and training which in the opinion of the board is equivalent to the minimum requirements of an approved program for psychiatric technicians in the state. Clinical inpatient experience shall be an integral part of any such prescribed or equivalent course of study and training.

(d) Have committed no act which, if committed by a licensed psychiatric technician, would be grounds for disciplinary action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 338, Sec. 18.   (SB 539)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4511.2.

The board shall deny the application for approval made by, and shall revoke the approval given to, any psychiatric technician school that does not give to student applicants credit, in the fields of nursing and psychiatric technician practice, for previous education and the opportunity to obtain credit for other acquired knowledge by the use of challenge examinations or other methods of evaluation.

The board shall prescribe, by regulation, the education for which credit is to be given and the amount of credit that is to be given for each type of education, including the amount of credit to be given to a psychiatric technician assistant, a certified nurse assistant, a nurse assistant who has provided direct nursing services in
 health facilities, and an applicant who has successfully completed equivalent courses offered by a secondary school that is accredited by the State Department of Education in any state or by a nationally recognized, regional accrediting body. These courses shall be assessed for equivalency by the psychiatric technician school.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 338, Sec. 19.   (SB 539)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4512.

An applicant for a psychiatric technician’s license shall, upon the filing of the application, pay to the board the application fee prescribed by this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 632, Sec. 42.   (AB 1536)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4513.

Unless otherwise provided in this chapter, every applicant for a psychiatric technician’s license shall be examined by the board. The examination shall be held at least once a year and at the times and places determined by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1323.)
-------------------------------------------

4515.

Upon written application and receipt of the required application fee the board may issue a license to any applicant who possesses a valid unrevoked license or certificate as a psychiatric technician issued by any other state or a foreign country, and who in the opinion of the board has the qualifications set forth in Section 4511.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1323.)
-------------------------------------------

4516.

Every person licensed under this chapter may be known as a licensed psychiatric technician and may place the letters P.T. after the licensee’s name.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 632, Sec. 43.   (AB 1536)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4517.

The board may, in its discretion, provide for a continuing education program in connection with the professional functions and courses described in this chapter. The number of course hours that the board may require in a continuing education program shall not exceed the number of course hours prescribed for licensed vocational nurses pursuant to Section 2892.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1078, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

4518.

In the event the board adopts a continuing education or blood withdrawal program, the board shall collect an initial approval and a biennial renewal fee as prescribed under Sections 4548 and 4518.1 from any provider of a course in continuing education or blood withdrawal who requests approval by the board of the course for purposes of continuing education or blood withdrawal requirements adopted by the board. The fee, however, shall in no event exceed the cost required for the board to administer the approval of continuing education or blood withdrawal courses by continuing education or blood withdrawal providers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 571, Sec. 20.   (SB 1480)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

4518.1.

The board shall collect an initial approval and a biennial renewal fee in the amount of one hundred fifty dollars ($150) unless a higher fee, not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250), is established by the board, from any provider of continuing education or a course to meet the certification requirements for blood withdrawal who requests approval by the board of the course for purposes of continuing education or blood withdrawal requirements under this chapter. That fee, however, shall not exceed the regulatory cost required for the board to administer the approval of continuing education or blood withdrawal by continuing education or blood withdrawal providers.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 571, Sec. 21.   (SB 1480)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

4519.

(a) In the case of a person who is employed by the state as a psychiatric technician, no state funds shall be expended in releasing the person from duty to attend continuing education courses, other than funds for in-service training and related state-provided programs.

(b) If the provisions of this section are in conflict with the provisions of a memorandum of understanding reached pursuant to Section 3517.5 of the Government Code, the memorandum of understanding shall be controlling without further legislative action, except that, if the provisions of a memorandum of understanding require the expenditure of funds, the provisions shall not become effective unless approved by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 208, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Disciplinary Proceedings [4520. - 4524.]

4520.

Every licensed psychiatric technician under this chapter may be disciplined as provided in this article. The disciplinary proceedings shall be conducted by the board in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1323.)
-------------------------------------------

4521.

The board may suspend or revoke a license issued under this chapter for any of the following reasons:

(a) Unprofessional conduct, which includes, but is not limited to, any of the following:

(1) Incompetence or gross negligence in carrying out usual psychiatric technician functions.

(2) A conviction of practicing medicine without a license in violation of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 2000) of Division 2, the record of conviction being conclusive evidence thereof.

(3) The use of advertising relating to psychiatric
 technician services which violates Section 17500.

(4) Obtain or possess in violation of law, or prescribe, or, except as directed by a licensed physician and surgeon, dentist, or podiatrist, administer to the licensee or furnish or administer to another, any controlled substance as defined in Division 10 (commencing with Section 11000) of the Health and Safety Code or any dangerous drug as defined in Section 4022.

(5) Use any controlled substance as defined in Division 10 (commencing with Section 11000) of the Health and Safety Code, or any dangerous drug as defined in Section 4022, or alcoholic beverages, to an extent or in a manner dangerous or injurious to the licensee, any other person, or the public or to the extent that the use impairs the ability to conduct with safety to
 the public the practice authorized by their license.

(6) Be convicted of a criminal offense involving the falsification of records concerning prescription, possession, or consumption of any of the substances described in paragraphs (4) and (5), in which event the record of the conviction is conclusive evidence of the conviction. The board may inquire into the circumstances surrounding the commission of the crime in order to fix the degree of discipline.

(7) Be committed or confined by a court of competent jurisdiction for intemperate use of or addiction to the use of any of the substances described in paragraphs (4) and (5), in which event the court order of commitment or confinement is prima facie evidence of the commitment or confinement.

(8) Falsify, or make grossly incorrect, grossly inconsistent, or unintelligible entries in any hospital, patient, or other record pertaining to the substances described in paragraph (4).

(b) Procuring a certificate or license by fraud, misrepresentation, or mistake.

(c) Violating or attempting to violate, directly or indirectly, or assisting in or abetting the violation of, or conspiring to violate any provision or terms of this chapter.

(d) Giving any false statement or information in connection with an application.

(e) Conviction of any offense substantially related to the qualifications,
 functions, and duties of a psychiatric technician, in which event the record of the conviction shall be conclusive evidence of the conviction. The board may inquire into the circumstances surrounding the commission of the crime in order to fix the degree of discipline.

(f) Impersonating any applicant or acting as proxy for an applicant in any examination required by this chapter.

(g) Impersonating another practitioner, or permitting another person to use the licensee’s certificate or license.

(h) The use of excessive force upon or the mistreatment or abuse of any patient.

(i) Aiding or assisting, or agreeing to aid or assist any person or persons, whether a
 licensed physician or not, in the performance of or arranging for a violation of any of the provisions of Article 12 (commencing with Section 2220) of Chapter 5 of Division 2.

(j) Failure to maintain confidentiality of patient medical information, except as disclosure is otherwise permitted or required by law.

(k) Failure to report to the commission any act prohibited by this section.

(l) The commission of any act punishable as a sexually related crime, if that act is substantially related to the duties and functions of the licensee.

(m) The commission of any act involving dishonesty, when that action is substantially related to the duties and
 functions of the licensee.

(n) Except for good cause, the knowing failure to protect patients by failing to follow infection control guidelines, thereby risking transmission of blood-borne infectious diseases from licensee to patient, from patient to patient, and from patient to licensee. In administering this subdivision, the board shall consider the standards, regulations, and guidelines of the State Department of Public Health developed pursuant to Section 1250.11 of the Health and Safety Code and the standards, guidelines, and regulations pursuant to the California Occupational Safety and Health Act of 1973 (Part 1 (commencing with Section 6300) of Division 5 of the Labor Code) for preventing the transmission of HIV, hepatitis B, and other blood-borne pathogens in health care settings. As necessary, the board shall consult with the
 Medical Board of California, the Board of Dental Examiners, and the Board of Registered Nursing, to encourage appropriate consistency in the implementation of this section.

(o) The board shall seek to ensure that licentiates and others regulated by the board are informed of the responsibility of licentiates and others to follow infection control guidelines, and of the most recent scientifically recognized safeguards for minimizing the risk of transmission of blood-borne infectious diseases.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 136, Sec. 10.   (AB 260)   Effective September 26, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

4521.1.

(a) The board may issue an initial license on probation, with specific terms and conditions, to any applicant who has violated any term of this chapter, but who has met all other requirements for licensure and who has successfully completed the examination for licensure within four years of the date of issuance of the initial license.

(b) Specific terms and conditions may include, but are not limited to, the following:

(1) Continuing medical, psychiatric, or psychological treatment.

(2) Ongoing participation in a specified rehabilitation program.

(3) Abstention from the use of alcohol or drugs.

(4) Compliance with all provisions of this chapter.
